District of Columbia statutes.
5-1105

Office of Police Complaints establishment; appointment of Executive Director.

(a)

There is established an Office of Police Complaints (“Office”).

(b)

The Office shall be headed by an Executive Director. The Executive Director shall be an attorney who is an active member in good standing of the District of Columbia Bar. The Board shall appoint the Executive Director to serve for a term of 3 years, or until a successor is appointed. An Executive Director may be reappointed. The Board may remove the Executive Director from office for cause. The Executive Director shall receive such compensation as is established by the Board.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-208, § 6, 45 DCR 8107
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 902(c), 51 DCR 9406

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-915.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-194, in the section heading and in subsec. (a), substituted “Police Complaints” for “Citizen Complaint Review”.